apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="tal/iari__vblex">
     <!-- 1-st conjugation paradigm for verbs with stressed "i". -->
      	<e><p><l>iari</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>iari</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      	
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìari</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìari</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>

    	<e><p><l>ìu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ii</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìa</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iati</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìati</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ìanu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iunu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìunu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ianu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	<e><p><l>ìava</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìavi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìava</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iàvamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iavamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iàvavu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iavavu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ìavanu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìavunu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iàvanu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iàvanu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	<e><p><l>ìavi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìasti</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìau</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ài</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iàstivu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iastivu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ìaru</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>ìa</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìassi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìati</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iàssiru</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìassiru</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	
    	<e><p><l>ìa</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ìamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìati</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìassi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ìassiru</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	
        <e r="LR"><p><l>iamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iati</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iassi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iassiru</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>irò</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrò</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irai</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrai</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irà</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrà</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iremu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irremu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iriti</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irriti</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>irannu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>irrannu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	 <!-- Pretérito de Subjuntivo -->
        <e><p><l>ìassi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìassi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìassi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìàssimu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iàssivu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iàssiru</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìassimu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìassivu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìassiru</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	 <!-- Condicional -->
    	<e><p><l>irìa</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iria</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irissi</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irìa</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iria</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irìamu</l><r>iari<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="arricriari"><i>arricr</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="taliari"><i>tal</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="criari"><i>cr</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disiari" a="BonnerDict"><i>dis</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disiari" r="LR" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>addis</l><r>dis</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lampiari"><i>lamp</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="maniari" a="BonnerDict"><i>man</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="passiari" a="BonnerDict"><i>pass</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuppuliari"><i>tuppul</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="annauliari"><i>annaul</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chiacchiariari"><i>chiacchiar</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chianchiari"><i>chianch</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mazziari" a="BonnerDict"><i>mazz</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pulizziari" a="BonnerDict"><i>pulizz</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pulizziari" r="LR" a="BonnerDict"><p><l>puliz</l><r>pulizz</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pulizziari" r="LR"><p><l>purizz</l><r>pulizz</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pulizziari" r="LR"><p><l>puriz</l><r>pulizz</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="puriggiari" r="LR"><p><l>pruiggi</l><r>puriggi</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stuiari"><i>stu</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stuiari" r="LR"><p><l>stuj</l><r>stui</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="studiari" r="LR"><p><l>stur</l><r>stud</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuppuliari" r="LR"><p><l>timpul</l><r>tuppul</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuppuliari" r="LR"><p><l>tumpul</l><r>tuppul</r></p><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="murmuriari"><i>murmur</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricriari"><par n="ri/re"/><i>cr</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diviari"><i>div</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cucchiariari"><i>cucchiar</i><par n="tal/iari__vblex"/></e>
